src/art-lex.txt
!****************************************************************************
! Common Functional Words
!
!  E. Uí Dhonnchadha
! (c)2001
! (1) New Irish Grammar by The Christian Brothers  
! (2) Réchúrsa Gramadaí, Brian Mac Giolla Phádraig
! (3) Graméir Gaeilge na mBráithre Críostaí
! (4) Nuachúrsa Gaeilge na mBráithre Críostaí
! (5) A Handbook of Irish Vol 2.An Outline of Modern Irish Grammar,
!     Alfred Bammesberger
! (6) Ó Dónaill Irish-English Dictionary
! (7) Gléacht - Ó Dónaill Online Dictionary 
!
! 
!****************************************************************************

Multichar_Symbols


+Art	! article
+Def	! definite 
	! There is no explicit indefinite article in Irish -
	! a noun without an article is indefinite.
+Masc	! masculine gender
+Fem	! feminine gender

+Com	! nominative, accusative,dative case
+Gen	! genitive case 

+Sg	! singular
+Pl	! plural
+NG	! Don't Generate 

LEXICON Root
        Articles;

LEXICON Articles

an+Art+Sg+Def:an		#;
an+Art+Sg+Def+NG:a'		#;
an+Art+Sg+Def+NG:'n		#;
an+Art+Sg+Def+NG:a			#;

na+Art+Pl+Def:na		#;
na+Art+Gen+Sg+Def+Fem:na	#;

!an+Art+Com+Sg+Def:an		#;
!an+Art+Gen+Sg+Def+Masc:an	#;
!na+Art+Com+Pl+Def:na		#;
!na+Art+Gen+Pl+Def:na		#;

!***************************************************************************
